Kentucky statutes. TITLE VII Public Property and Public Printing
General Provisions

56.005.
Composting and use of composted materials by state agencies.

To the maximum extent practicable all state agencies responsible for the maintenance of public lands in the Commonwealth shall do the following:

Compost on those public lands grass clippings, leaves, and other yard waste collected at state and local government facilities;

Use and make available for other state agencies’ use, those materials composted on state lands for projects including, but not limited to, roadway construction, reconstruction, or maintenance, restoration of sites including abandoned mine lands reclamation, stream bank stabilization, and reforestation; and

Give preference, when making purchases of materials, to the use of compost for land maintenance activities according to procurement procedures set out in KRS

45A.520

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 12, § 58, effective February 26, 1991.

56.010.
Action for trespass or injury to state property.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall institute civil proceedings in the name of the Commonwealth for any trespass or injury to state property under its control.

History.

3947: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 255, § 56.

56.020.
Secretary of State to have custody of title documents.

The Secretary of State shall have custody of all records, judgments, deeds, maps and abstracts of title of land or buildings owned for governmental purposes by the state except deeds to rights-of-way for state or federal roads. In this section, “roads” does not include state-owned bridges or their approaches.

The Secretary of State shall record all the deeds in a separate book and shall file, keep and have accessible the originals of all papers mentioned in subsection (1) of this section, and the books in which they are recorded. He shall index and cross-index the original papers and record books, including an index according to the county where the property is located and according to the use or department of the state government using the property. The records and indexes shall not be moved from the Office of the Secretary of State.

History.

2337a, 2337a-1: amend. Acts 1982, ch. 240, § 4, effective July 15, 1982.

Opinions of Attorney General.

This section and KRS

56.040

must be construed together and, therefore, the exception as to a lease of not more than six offices under KRS

56.040

would apply where a lease is longer than one year and such a lease involving not more than six offices need not be filed pursuant to this section.

OAG 72-488

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Certified copy of record in Office of Secretary of State, use as evidence, KRS

14.050

.

Purchase or sale of real estate by state, who to authorize, KRS

45A.045

.

56.030.
State, when made grantee or lessee of land.

Except as provided in KRS

177.060

,

177.070

and

183.120

, the Commonwealth shall be named as the grantee of any land given or devised to the state, or partly or wholly paid for out of state funds, and of any land or interest in land conveyed to it or for its use or for the use of any of its agencies or officers.

Except as provided in KRS

183.120

, the Commonwealth shall be named as the lessee in all leases for governmental purposes or for the use of the state.

History.

2337a-2, 2337a-6.

56.040.
Finance and Administration Cabinet or Transportation Cabinet to provide for title examination and certification of land or interest in land paid for out of state funds.

When any land or interest in land is to be paid for out of state funds, the Finance and Administration Cabinet (Transportation Cabinet for requirements of that cabinet) shall take action to provide for the examination and certification of the title to the affected land, with or without exceptions, by an attorney licensed to practice law in this state, or for the insurance of the title to such land by a land title insurance company authorized to do business in this state. A survey and plat of the land showing the corners, angles, and calls of the land shall be made by a competent land surveyor prior to the date of the deed conveying the land or any interest therein to the state. The costs incurred under this section shall be charged against the funds of the agency for whose use and benefit the land is acquired.

History.

2337a-3, 2337a-6: amend. Acts 1982, ch. 240, § 5, effective July 15, 1982.

56.050.
Land acquired by condemnation or damage suit — Copy of judgment to be recorded.

When the state acquires title to any land or interest in land, as contemplated by KRS

56.020

, by condemnation proceedings or through payment of damages for an injury to land, the Secretary of State shall be furnished a copy, certified by the clerk of the court, of the judgment vesting such title in the state, and shall be furnished the other information required by KRS

56.040

. The Secretary of State shall keep and record such information as provided in KRS

56.020

.

History.

2337a-4.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Penal institutions, condemnation of land for, KRS

196.140

.

56.060.
Recording of deeds or judgments affecting state lands — Duty of clerk.

All deeds and judgments conveying to or from or vesting in or divesting the state of any land or interest in land shall be recorded in the office of the county clerk of the county where the land or the greater part of it lies.

In cases conveying to or vesting in the state any land or interest therein, other than highway right-of-way acquisitions, the deed or copy of the judgment shall be immediately transmitted to the Secretary of State by the clerk. The county clerk shall endorse on the document the book, page number and county where he has recorded it, as follows: “Recorded in . . . . . Book . . . . . , Page . . . . . , . . . . . County Clerk’s Office.”

In cases of deeds or judgments conveying from or divesting the state of land or an interest therein, the clerk shall immediately transmit a copy of the document to the Secretary of State. This document shall be endorsed as follows: “Recorded in . . . . . Book . . . . . , Page . . . . . , . . . . . County Clerk’s Office.”

History.

2337a-5: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 384, § 124, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 311, § 1, effective July 15, 1982.

56.062.
Inspection — Notice — Asbestos agency account.

The cabinet shall cause an inspection to be made of all buildings owned, leased or operated by the Commonwealth for the presence of friable materials. If friable materials are found as a result of such inspection, the cabinet shall have samples of the friable materials analyzed for asbestos in accordance with testing methods established by the Environmental Protection Agency, as provided in 40 CFR 763.109 as amended.

When friable asbestos-containing materials are identified in a state building, a notice shall be conspicuously posted on each entrance to the building informing the users of the building of their presence. The notice shall include the following warning:

WARNING: THIS BUILDING HAS BEEN INSPECTED FOR FRIABLE (EASILY CRUMBLED) MATERIALS WHICH CONTAIN ASBESTOS. FRIABLE ASBESTOS-CONTAINING MATERIALS MAY CAUSE HEALTH PROBLEMS AND ARE PRESENT IN THIS BUILDING. A RECORD OF THE INSPECTION AND A DIAGRAM OF THE LOCATION OF FRIABLE ASBESTOS-CONTAINING MATERIALS ARE AVAILABLE IN ROOM
_________
OF THIS BUILDING.

The cabinet shall provide to all persons employed in state buildings found to contain friable asbestos-containing materials, a written notice of the location, by room or building area, of all friable asbestos-containing materials in the building.

When friable asbestos-containing materials are not found as a result of inspection, the following notice shall be conspicuously posted on each entrance to the building:

THIS BUILDING HAS BEEN INSPECTED FOR FRIABLE (EASILY CRUMBLED) MATERIALS WHICH CONTAIN ASBESTOS. FRIABLE ASBESTOS-CONTAINING MATERIAL MAY CAUSE HEALTH PROBLEMS. THIS BUILDING DOES NOT CONTAIN FRIABLE ASBESTOS-CONTAINING MATERIALS.

When inspections identify asbestos-containing material that is not friable, the cabinet shall cause an annual inspection of the building to be made to determine if the asbestos-containing material has become friable.

When inspections identify asbestos in a building which has been enclosed or encapsulated to prevent its spread, a notice shall be posted in the custodial offices of the building informing maintenance personnel of the location of such materials.

When asbestos-containing materials have been removed from a building, any notice previously posted in such building pursuant to this section regarding the asbestos-containing materials so removed may be removed.

Expenditures required to implement this section may be paid from the asbestos agency account established within the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 357, § 2, effective July 15, 1986.

56.063.
Deposit and use of savings generated as result of refunding transaction.

As used in this section:

“Asset/liability commission” means the Kentucky Asset/Liability Commission established by KRS

56.861

;

“Commission” means the State Property and Buildings Commission established by KRS

56.450

;

“General fund” has the same meaning as in KRS 48.010(15)(a);

“Present value savings” means the difference expressed in terms of current dollars between debt service on refunded bonds and debt service on refunding bonds;

“Refunded bonds” means outstanding bonds, notes, or other obligations that were issued at any time, and that are refinanced through a refunding transaction;

“Refunding bonds” means new bonds, notes, or other obligations issued to refund outstanding bonds, notes, or other obligations, including redemption premiums and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption as part of a refunding transaction;

“Refunding transaction” means a transaction:

Whereby outstanding bonds, notes, or other obligations are refunded by the issuance of new refunding bonds, notes, or other obligations; and

That is directly supported in whole or in part by appropriations from the general fund or road fund;

“Revenue shortfall” has the same meaning as in KRS 48.010(18);

“Road fund” has the same meaning as in KRS 48.010(15)(g); and

“State agency”:

Includes:

Any state administrative body, agency, department, or division as defined in KRS

42.005

; and

Any board, commission, institution, or division exercising any function of the state;

with the authority to issue bonds, notes, or other obligations, and to enter into refunding transactions with respect to those bonds, notes, or other obligations; but

Does not include universities that are part of the postsecondary education system, as defined in KRS

164.001

.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes, the savings generated from reduced debt service payments during a fiscal biennium as a result of any refunding transaction undertaken by the commission, the asset/liability commission, or any state agency that:

Results in a reduction in required debt service during the fiscal biennium; and

Does not result in positive net present value savings;

shall be deposited in the budget reserve trust fund account established by KRS

48.705

, and shall not be used as part of any budget-balancing measures adopted or taken by the executive branch either in response to a revenue shortfall, or to address expenditure reductions required by an enacted biennial budget for the executive branch.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 42, § 1, effective July 12, 2012.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/12/2012). Under the authority of KRS 7.136(1), the Reviser of Statutes has corrected a manifest clerical or typographical error in subsection (1)(g)2. of this statute during codification. The meaning of the text was not changed.